repository/apertium_hn_LC.dix
<pardef n="regular__adj-noun">
 <e>           <p><l></l>      <r></r></p><par n="kAl/A__adj"/></e>
 <e>           <p><l></l>      <r></r></p><par n="kAl/A__n"/></e>
<!--  <e>           <p><l></l>      <r></r></p><par n="vAl/A__n"/></e> -->
<!--  <e>           <p><l></l>      <r></r></p><par n="vAl/A__adj"/></e> -->
  <e>           <p><l></l>      <r></r></p><par n="ladak/A__n"/></e>
  <e>           <p><l></l>      <r></r></p><par n="ladak/I__n"/></e>

  </pardef>

<!--Added by Kirti Garg kirti.garg@gmail.com for the LC project -->

<pardef n="calaciwr/a__n">
            <e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
            <e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
            <e><p><l>oM</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
            <e><p><l>oM</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
        
    <pardef n="pIdZ/A__n">
        <e><p><l>A</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>A</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>AeM</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>AeM</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>AoM</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>AoM</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>iwa</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>iwa</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>iwoM</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>iwoM</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>iwA</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>iwA</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>iwAoM</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>iwAoM</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>iwAeM</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>iwAeM</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>AxAyaka</l><r>A<s n="cat:adj"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>AhIna</l><r>A<s n="cat:adj"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>AxAyI</l><r>A<s n="cat:adj"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    
  </pardefs>

<e lm="calaciwra"><i>calaciwr</i><par n="calaciwr/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="acakkA"><i>acakk</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="adagadA"><i>adagad</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="ahAwA"><i>ahAw</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="ajUbA"><i>ajUb</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="akelAxukelA"><i>akelAxukel</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="AlhA"><i>Alh</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="aMduA"><i>aMdu</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="aMXerA"><i>aMXer</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="anacInhA"><i>anacInh</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="anasunI"><i>anasunI</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="anusArI"><i>anusArI</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="araGA"><i>araG</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="ASikAnA"><i>ASikAn</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="axabakAyaxA"><i>axabakAyax</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="aXamarA"><i>aXamar</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="azgArA"><i>azgAr</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="AzvalA"><i>Azval</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="baCedA"><i>baCed</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="badakA"><i>badak</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="BagavA"><i>Bagav</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="bAharavAlA"><i>bAharavAl</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="bahuXA"><i>bahuX</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="bakasuA"><i>bakasu</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="balavA"><i>balav</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="BAMgadA"><i>BAMgad</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="baniA"><i>bani</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="bArahasiMgA"><i>bArahasiMg</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="BARAsaMbaMXI"><i>BARAsaMbaMXI</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="BatTA"><i>BatT</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="bawiyA"><i>bawiy</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="baztavArA"><i>baztavAr</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="beparaxA"><i>beparax</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="bIGA"><i>bIG</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="bolabAlA"><i>bolabAl</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="bUdA"><i>bUd</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="BurawA"><i>Buraw</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="CakadA"><i>Cakad</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="camakIlA"><i>camakIl</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="carKA"><i>carK</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="cAzxawArA"><i>cAzxawAr</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="CIMtA"><i>CIMt</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="cogA"><i>cog</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="cOMkAnevAlA"><i>cOMkAnevAl</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="cOWA"><i>cOW</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="curamurA"><i>curamur</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="darAvanA"><i>darAvan</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="dyoDA"><i>dyoD</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="EsI"><i>EsI</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="galIkUcA"><i>galIkUc</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="gapodA"><i>gapod</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="GatTA"><i>GatT</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="geMxA"><i>geMx</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="gorAcittA"><i>gorAcitt</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="gullIdaMdA"><i>gullIdaMd</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="guwWamaguwWA"><i>guwWamaguwW</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="halkA"><i>halk</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="haWagolA"><i>haWagol</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="hilorA"><i>hilor</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="huliyAnAmA"><i>huliyAnAm</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="iwanA"><i>iwan</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="jalasA"><i>jalas</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="JaranA"><i>Jaran</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="jimaKAnA"><i>jimaKAn</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="jUdA"><i>jUd</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="kacarA"><i>kacar</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="kA"><i>k</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="kAlI"><i>kAlI</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="kAnA"><i>kAn</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="KaracIlA"><i>KaracIl</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="KarI"><i>KarI</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="katAriyA"><i>katAriy</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="KemA"><i>Kem</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="kirakirA"><i>kirakir</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="KotA"><i>Kot</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="KulAsA"><i>KulAs</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="kurwA"><i>kurw</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="lAdalA"><i>lAdal</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="lAvA"><i>lAv</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="lugaxA"><i>lugax</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="majamA"><i>majam</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="maMgalI"><i>maMgalI</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="mArSalalA"><i>mArSalal</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="matakA"><i>matak</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="mAzgatIkA"><i>mAzgatIk</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="moDA"><i>moD</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="motA"><i>mot</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="muKiyA"><i>muKiy</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="muxxA"><i>muxx</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="nakakatA"><i>nakakat</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="nAtA"><i>nAt</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="nirAlA"><i>nirAl</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="oCA"><i>oC</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="paharAvA"><i>paharAv</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="pallA"><i>pall</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="PaPolA"><i>PaPol</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="parirakRiwA"><i>parirakRiw</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="pattA"><i>patt</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="pAzsA"><i>pAzs</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="pExA"><i>pEx</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="PIwA"><i>PIw</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="pramAxI"><i>pramAxI</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="PUlavAlA"><i>PUlavAl</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="puwalA"><i>puwal</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="raIsajAxA"><i>raIsajAx</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="rassA"><i>rass</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="rojA"><i>roj</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="saccA"><i>sacc</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="sajaxA"><i>sajax</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="saMperA"><i>saMper</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="SarAbajaxA"><i>SarAbajax</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="sattA"><i>satt</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="seharA"><i>sehar</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="siMGAdA"><i>siMGAd</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="soPA"><i>soP</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="sUnI"><i>sUnI</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="tedA"><i>ted</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="tonA"><i>ton</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="ulatApalatA"><i>ulatApalat</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="vajIPA"><i>vajIP</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="vicewA"><i>vicew</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="wA"><i>w</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="wamagA"><i>wamag</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="wejapawwA"><i>wejapaww</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="wopaKAnA"><i>wopaKAn</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="xAKilA"><i>xAKil</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="xariyAIGodA"><i>xariyAIGod</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="xAzwA"><i>xAzw</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="xomuzhA"><i>xomuzh</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="xuKadA"><i>xuKad</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="xUXamuzhA"><i>xUXamuzh</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
